Washington statutes.
RCW 16.57.040

Production record brands.

The director may provide for the use of production record brands. Numbers for such brands shall be issued at the discretion of the director and shall be placed on livestock immediately below the recorded ownership brand or any other location prescribed by the director.

[ 2003 c 326 s 8; 1974 ex.s. c 64 s 1; 1959 c 54 s 4.]